Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-2,113
Chief Water Officer; modify appropriation or application; when.

It is in the state's and the public interest that the filing of the following classes of applications before the Chief Water Officer demand that the Chief Water Officer shall appropriately modify any existing or pending instream appropriation or application to not interfere with such application or the granting of such appropriation:

(1) Applications for induced recharge to public water supply wells;

(2) Applications for storage rights necessary for flood and sediment control projects which are dry or will not result in a net consumption of water exceeding two hundred acre-feet on an average annual basis;

(3) Applications for transfer permits associated with natural flow, storage use, power generation, or hydropower;

(4) Applications for de minimis uses; or

(5) Applications for industrial or manufacturing de minimis consumptive uses.

Laws 1997, LB 877, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 145;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 128.